West Virginia, session 2026, HB4148.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 40. WEST VIRGINIA REAL ESTATE LICENSE ACT. §30-40-13. Qualifications for salesperson’s license. (a) An applicant for a salesperson’s license shall:(1) Submit satisfactory evidence of having completed the required education course as provided in §30-40-14 of this code; and(2) Successfully pass the examination or examinations provided by the commission; and(3) Submit proof that the applicant is a United States citizen or an individual who is legally authorized by the federal government to work in the United States.(b) No salesperson’s license may be issued in the name of an entity except through one of its members or officers.(c) No salesperson’s license may be issued in the name of an entity unless each member or officer, who will engage in the real estate business, obtains a license as a real estate salesperson or associate broker. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home